Mississippi, session 2026, HB1928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of paying salaries, mileage, insurance, matching funds and the daily expense allowance of the members of the Legislature for the Regular Session of 2027 and providing contingent funds for the House of Representatives and Senate for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows: For salaries, mileage, insurance, matching funds and daily expense allowance of members of the House of Representatives....... $   4,860,061.00. For Contingent Fund for the House of Representatives.............. $  10,280,140.00. Out of the above amount appropriated for the Contingent Fund for the House of Representatives, not more than Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) shall be expended for defraying the expenses of and for the use of the members of the Mississippi Commission on Interstate Cooperation, as created under Section 5-5-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972. For salaries, mileage, insurance, matching funds and daily expense allowance of members of the Senate........................ $   2,162,873.00. For Contingent Fund for the Senate......... $ 7,153,947.00. Out of the above amount appropriated for the Contingent Fund for the Senate, not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) shall be expended for defraying the expenses of and for the use of the members of the Mississippi Commission on Interstate Cooperation, as created under Section 5-5-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972. For the joint legislative operations of the House of Representatives and the Senate........ $   1,371,962.00. For the expenses of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee..................... $   5,803,724.00. For the expenses of the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review................ $   2,998,500.00. For the expenses of the Joint Legislative Reapportionment Committee............. $     266,780.00. For the expenses of the Joint Legislative Code Committee....................... $     420,000.00. The Joint Legislative Reapportionment Committee shall prepare, publish and provide semiannual reports to each member of the Legislature and such reports shall provide a line-by-line detailed accounting of all receipts and expenditures of any and all monies appropriated by the Legislature to the Joint Legislative Reapportionment Committee.  Any meetings of the Joint Legislative Reapportionment Committee shall be held in state offices or at publicly owned facilities. SECTION 2.  The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of paying the monthly expense allowance of the members of the Legislature, as provided in Section 5-1-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows: For the House of Representatives........... $ 2,965,649.00. For the Senate............................ $ 1,223,322.00. SECTION 3.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of paying the state's share of various assessments for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................... $     504,726.00. Of the funds authorized in this section, the following distribution shall be made: Southern States Energy Board............... $ 29,077.00. Interstate Cooperation.................... $ 391,129.00. National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws................... $ 46,120.00. The Energy Council........................ $ 38,400.00. SECTION 4.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the joint operations of the House of Representatives and the Senate not otherwise appropriated, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................. .............................................. $ 50,000.00. SECTION 5.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this Legislature for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 6.  None of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act may be used to pay or reimburse any expenses of out-of-state travel for any member or employee of the House of Representatives without prior approval of the House Management Committee or for any member or employee of the Senate without prior approval of the Senate Rules Committee. SECTION 7. Of the funds provided herein, the Clerk of the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Secretary of the Mississippi Senate may transfer funds between accounts for their respective chambers which are administered by the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Mississippi Senate. SECTION 8.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 9.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.